Hawaii statutes.
§91-7 Declaratory judgment on validity of
rules. (a) Any interested person may obtain a judicial declaration as to
the validity of an agency rule as provided in subsection (b) by bringing an
action against the agency in the circuit court or, if applicable, the
environmental court, of the county in which the petitioner resides or has its
principal place of business. The action may be maintained whether or not the
petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule
in question.

(b) The court shall declare the rule invalid
if it finds that it violates constitutional or statutory provisions, or exceeds
the statutory authority of the agency, or was adopted without compliance with
statutory rulemaking procedures. [L 1961, c 103, §7; Supp, §6C-7; HRS §91-7; am
L 2014, c 218, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

Agency rule adopted under former version of statute without
authority upon statute's amendment. Att. Gen. Op. 85-13.

Case Notes

Plaintiff required to exhaust remedy under this section
before resorting to federal court to attack regulation as unconstitutional.
252 F. Supp. 223.

Rules not adopted in compliance with chapter 91 are invalid.
55 H. 478, 522 P.2d 1255.

Dismissal of complaint for declaratory judgment for failure
to join indispensable parties held erroneous. 58 H. 292, 568 P.2d 1189.

"Interested persons." 63 H. 166, 623 P.2d 431.

Plaintiff had standing under "injury in fact" test
to bring action under this section where plaintiff alleged injury by insurer's
denial of medical treatment, injury fairly traceable to agency's rules, and
decision precluding use of rule would likely provide plaintiff relief. 82 H.
249, 921 P.2d 169.

A water management area designation under chapter 174C may
not be challenged in an original action pursuant to this section. 83 H. 484,
927 P.2d 1367.

A plaintiff seeking "a judicial declaration as to the
validity of an agency rule", pursuant to this section, must "reside
or have its principal place of business" in the county in which the
adjudicating circuit court sits; initiating an action under this section in the
wrong circuit is a defect of jurisdiction mandating dismissal. 114 H. 87, 157
P.3d 526.

For purposes of declaratory actions brought pursuant to
subsection (a), the circuit court of the plaintiff's domicile is the only
circuit court that may exercise jurisdiction over the subject matter. 114 H.
87, 157 P.3d 526.

Petitioner had standing to challenge the validity of §3-122-66
(repealed), Hawaii administrative rules, as mandated by "the needs of
justice"; petitioner was not required to satisfy the three-part injury in
fact test to obtain standing as an "interested person". 132 H. 333,
322 P.3d 228 (2014).

The circuit court's ruling that §3-122-66 (repealed), Hawaii
administrative rules, was invalid satisfied the statutory mandate of this
section; the court did not err in refusing to declare that the rule "has
never been valid and has always been ultra vires and void ab initio". 132
H. 333, 322 P.3d 228 (2014).

Under this section, court authorized to order ancillary,
affirmative relief. 5 H. App. 419, 697 P.2d 43; 6 H. App. 160, 715 P.2d 813.

Cited: 939 F. Supp. 746.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next